Vermont, session 2025-2026, S274.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9741(26) is amended to read:
(26)(A) Sales of electricity, oil, gas, and other fuels used in a residence
for all domestic use, including heating, but not including fuel sold at retail in
free-standing containers, or sold as part of a transaction where a free-standing
container is exchanged without a separate charge. Wood pellets sold to an
individual on the vendor’s premises or delivered to an individual’s residence
shall be presumed to be purchased for residential use and shall be exempt sales
under this subdivision unless the vendor knew or ought reasonably to have
VT LEG #384991 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.274
2026 Page 2 of 2
known that the wood pellets were not purchased for residential use. A
certificate of exemption shall not be required for exempt retail sales of wood
pellets to an individual. The Commissioner shall by rule determine that
portion of the sales attributable to domestic use where fuels are used for
purposes in addition to domestic use.
(B) As used in this subdivision (26), “residence” means any
residential property that was not included on the most recent list published
pursuant to subdivision (C) of this subdivision (26) as most recently classified
as “nonhomestead residential” under section 4152a of this title.
(C) Annually on July 1, the Commissioner shall publish a list of
addresses for all properties most recently classified as “nonhomestead
residential” under section 4152a of this title. Notwithstanding section 9703 of
this title, or any other provision of law to the contrary, a seller shall be held
harmless from sales tax liability resulting from a transaction in which the seller
relied on the list published pursuant to this subdivision (26)(C) and tax was not
collected due to an error or omission on the list.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2029.
VT LEG #384991 v.1